Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 1. Department of Banking and Consumer Finance
§ 81-1-103.
Investigation of proposed federal cease and desist, suspension or removal orders to state chartered banks.

If the commissioner receives notice from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof having authority to issue cease and desist, removal or suspension orders to state-chartered banks supervised by the department, of its intention to issue any such cease and desist, removal or suspension order to any state-chartered bank, then the commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to investigate the act, cause or basis asserted for the issuance of such proposed order.

If such investigation shall disclose, in the opinion and judgment of the commissioner, that the act, cause or basis complained of has occurred, and that it is detrimental to the safety and welfare of the depositors or stockholders of the bank and contrary to the public interest, and if the act, cause or basis complained of shall not be remedied immediately, then the commissioner may give notice to the board of directors of the bank of the charges together with his concurrence or exceptions thereto and the remedies for the same. Failure of the board of directors to comply with the requirements of the commissioner within thirty (30) days from the date of notice shall render the board of directors in default thereupon. Thereafter the commissioner may remove any officer, director or other person responsible for the noncompliance, or he may notify the appropriate federal agency or instrumentality to proceed under the federal statute or regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 25; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 26; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-105.
Injunction against commissioner by bank.

The commissioner may be enjoined in chancery court by any bank for abuse or misuse of any discretion or duty imposed upon him by the provisions of Title 81 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other laws of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 26; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 26; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 25; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 27; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-107.
Assessment against banks for maintenance fund.

Every bank organized under the laws of this state engaging in the business of a commercial bank, trust company or any combination thereof, is assessed for each year the sum of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) and every such corporation whose total assets exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall further pay in addition to the minimum assessment of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00), Fifty Cents (50¢) for each One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or fraction thereof of assets in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). All money accruing from such assessment shall be used for the maintenance of the department.

The commissioner shall, during the month of January in each year, or as soon thereafter as practicable, prepare a statement of the assessments due under this section based upon the total assets of each such corporation, as shown by its last report, which shall be paid as called for by the commissioner. He shall send to each such corporation a statement of the amount due by it, which shall specify how the same shall be payable. The assessment shall be due and payable in accordance with the statement so furnished and the installments thereof shall be paid within ten (10) days after the date fixed for their payment. Such assessment shall constitute a lien on the assets of each bank until paid. Any such corporation failing to make payment within ten (10) days as herein provided shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount in default for each day thereafter. All assessments and penalties provided in this section shall be payable to the commissioner and when collected by him shall be delivered to the State Treasurer to be placed to the credit of the maintenance fund of the department. The commissioner shall give a receipt for all money received by him and shall take a receipt from the State Treasurer for all money delivered to him. In making any call for the assessment levied by this section the commissioner shall estimate the cost of maintaining the department for the current year, and if the assessments hereby levied shall appear to produce more than such estimate, he shall reduce accordingly the Fifty Cents (50¢) per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of assets assessment provided in this section. The cash balance remaining in the maintenance fund of the department at the end of any one (1) fiscal year shall be credited to and reduce the assessments of the following fiscal year on a pro rata basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 27; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 27; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 26; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 28; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-109.
Disbursements from department maintenance fund.

All moneys paid out of the department maintenance fund shall be paid by the Treasurer upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer, which warrants shall be issued by the State Fiscal Officer upon a voucher approved by the commissioner except in the payment of salaries and expenses, and warrants shall be issued by the State Fiscal Officer therefor upon a voucher approved by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 28; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 28; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 27; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 29; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-111.
Forms and record books to be supplied.

For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of Title 81 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, the commissioner shall provide the necessary forms. All reports received by the commissioner shall be preserved by him in the department. The State Treasurer is authorized to provide forms and record books for the office of the commissioner, and such forms and record books shall be paid for upon order of the commissioner out of the department maintenance fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 29; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 29; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 28; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 30; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-113.
Annual report to legislature.

The commissioner shall make a full report as required by law of other state officers, to the Legislature at each regular session thereof, of the proceedings in and work of the department and of all charters issued and all banks closed for insolvency or voluntarily liquidated. He shall submit with each report such recommendations with reference to the department as he may consider appropriate. The report shall show fully, separately, and in detail the work done and the expenses incurred by the commissioner and each examiner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 30; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 30; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 29; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 31; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-115.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates.

The department shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of incorporation of banking corporations and credit unions, and issuing a certificate of incorporation, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing articles of merger when the resulting bank or credit union is a state bank or credit union, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for conversion from a national bank, state or federal thrift, or credit union to a state bank or credit union, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for a branch bank or credit union, a minimum fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) up to a maximum fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for a Loan Production Office (LPO), a minimum fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) up to a maximum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for an electronic terminal, a minimum fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) up to a maximum fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application to establish out-of-state branch offices by in-state banks and credit unions, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application to establish in-state branch offices by an out-of-state bank or credit union, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application to establish a branch of a foreign bank, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall publish a schedule of fees applicable to all banks within his jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 31; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 31; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 30; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 32; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 33; Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-117.
Transfer of functions.

Upon March 21, 1980, the Department of Bank Supervision and the office of State Comptroller, as created by Section 81-1-1, and the State Banking Board, as created by Section 81-3-13, are hereby abolished. The functions, duties and responsibilities of the Department of Bank Supervision, the office of State Comptroller and the State Banking Board shall be assumed by the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, and the State Board of Banking Review, respectively, as provided in this chapter. All assets, funds, contractual rights and obligations, records, equipment and property rights which are now vested in the Department of Bank Supervision, the office of State Comptroller and the State Banking Board are hereby vested in the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, and the State Board of Banking Review, respectively.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 312, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 303, § 32; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 46, § 31; Laws, 1993, ch. 442, § 33; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-119.
Notice of charges; temporary cease and desist order.

If any person or state bank is engaging in, or has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the bank’s business, or violation of any other law, rule, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, the commissioner may issue a notice of charges to such person or institution. A notice of charges shall specify the acts alleged to sustain a cease and desist order, and state the time and place at which a hearing shall be held. A hearing before the commissioner on the charges shall be held no earlier than seven (7) days, and no later than fifteen (15) days, after issuance of the notice. The charged institution is entitled to a further extension of seven (7) days upon filing a request with the commissioner. The commissioner may also issue a notice of charges if he has reasonable grounds to believe that any person or bank is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound business practice, or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order. If, by a preponderance of the evidence, it is shown that any person or bank is engaged in, or has been engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound business practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, a cease and desist order shall be issued which shall be permanently binding upon the person or institution until terminated by the commissioner.

If any person or state bank is engaging in, has engaged in, or is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the bank’s business, or any violation of any law, rules, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, and the commissioner has determined that immediate corrective action is required, the commissioner may issue a temporary cease and desist order without prior notice. A temporary cease and desist order shall be effective immediately upon issuance for a period of fifteen (15) days, and may be extended once for a period of fifteen (15) days. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Cease and Desist Order.” A hearing before the commissioner shall be held within the time that the order remains effective, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or made permanent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 34; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-121.
Bank violation; civil penalty.

Except as otherwise provided, any bank which is found to have violated any provision of Chapters 1 through 9, Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). Any bank which is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this chapter may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty and to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a state bank from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 2; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 35; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-123.
Director, officer or employee violation; civil penalty.

Any person, whether a director, officer or employee, who is found to have violated any provision of Chapters 1 through 9, Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, whether willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, gross incompetency or recklessness, may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation. Any person who is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this chapter may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty, to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a director, officer or employee of a state bank from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 3; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 36; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-125.
Commissioner to issue orders for supervisory control with regard to banks.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a solvent bank is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner, or in any fashion which threatens the financial integrity or sound operation of the bank, the commissioner may serve a notice of charges on the bank, requiring it to show why it should not be placed under supervisory control. Such notice of charges shall specify the grounds for supervisory control, and set the time and place for a hearing. A hearing before the commissioner pursuant to such notice shall be held within fifteen (15) days after issuance of the notice of charges.

If, after the hearing provided above, the commissioner determines that supervisory control of the bank is necessary to protect the bank’s members, customers, stockholders or creditors, or the general public, the commissioner shall issue an order taking supervisory control of the bank.

If the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner may appoint an agent to supervise and monitor the operations of the bank during the period of supervisory control. During the period of supervisory control, the bank shall act in accordance with such instructions as may be given by the commissioner, directly or through his supervisory agent, and shall not fail to act, except when to do so would violate an outstanding cease and desist order.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner shall issue an order approving a plan for the termination of supervisory control. The plan may provide for:

The issuance by the bank of capital stock;

The appointment of one or more officers and/or directors;

The reorganization, merger or consolidation of the bank;

The dissolution and liquidation of the bank;

Other such measures as determined by the commissioner.

The order approving the plan shall not take effect until thirty (30) days after issuance during which time period an appeal may be filed in a court of competent jurisdiction.

All costs of this proceeding shall be paid by the bank.

For the purpose of this section, an order shall be deemed final if:

No appeal is filed within the specific time allowed for the appeal; or

All judicial appeals are exhausted.

If a bank is insolvent, the provisions of Chapter 9 of Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 4; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 37; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-127.
Commissioner to issue notice of charges to employee who has participated in any violation.

If, in the commissioner’s opinion, any director, officer or employee of any bank has participated in, or consented to, any violation of any law, rule, regulation or order, or any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any bank, or any insider loan not specifically authorized by law, or any repeated violation of, or failure to comply with, any bank’s bylaws, the commissioner may serve a written notice of charges upon such director, officer or employee and the bank, stating his intent to remove such director, officer or employee. Such notice shall specify the alleged conduct of such director, officer or employee and shall state the place for a hearing before the commissioner. A hearing shall be held no earlier than fifteen (15) days, but no later than thirty (30) days, after the notice of charges is served. If, after the hearing, the commissioner determines that the charges asserted have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the commissioner may issue an order removing the director, officer or employee in question. Such an order shall be effective upon issuance and may include the entire board of directors or all of the officers of the bank.

If it is determined that any director, officer or employee of any bank has knowingly participated in, or consented to, any violation of any law, rule, regulation or order, or engaged in any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any bank, or any repeated violation of, or failure to comply with, any bank’s bylaws, and that as a result, a situation exists requiring immediate corrective action, the commissioner may issue an order temporarily removing such person or persons pending a hearing. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Order of Removal” and shall be effective upon issuance for a period of fifteen (15) days. Such order may be extended once for a period of fifteen (15) days. A hearing must be held within ten (10) days of the expiration of a temporary order, or any extension thereof, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or converted to a permanent order.

Any removal pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be effective in all respects as if such removal has been made by the board of directors and the members or stockholders of the bank in question.

Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, no director, officer or employee permanently removed pursuant to this section or otherwise removed by a federal agency of proper authority shall be eligible to be elected, reelected or appointed to any position as a director, officer or employee of that bank, nor shall such director, officer or employee be eligible to be elected to or retain a position as a director, officer or employee of any other state bank, bank subsidiary, bank holding company or any other entity regulated by the department.

The commissioner may promulgate rules or regulations and/or cooperate with any other state or federal administrative agencies in order to enforce the prohibitions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 5; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 38; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 38; Laws, 2014, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 81-1-129.
Appeal of cease and desist order.

Any person or state bank against whom a cease and desist order is issued or a fine is imposed may have such order or fine reviewed by a court of competent jurisdiction. Except as otherwise provided, an appeal may be made only within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the order or the imposition of the fine, whichever is later.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 6; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 39; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-131.
Fines and penalties; reimbursement.

No person who is fined or penalized for a violation of any criminal provision of this chapter shall be reimbursed or indemnified in any fashion by the bank for such fine or penalty.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 7; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 40; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-133.
Cumulative penalties, fines and remedies.

All penalties, fines and remedies provided by this chapter shall be cumulative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 8; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 497, § 41; brought forward, Laws, 2001, ch. 410, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-1-135.
Consumer industry licensees required to participate in multistate licensing system.

The Legislature finds that a uniform multistate administration of a multistate licensing system for consumer industry licensees regulated by the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance is consistent with both the public interest and the provisions of law regulating those licensees; therefore, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance may require consumer industry licensees to participate in a multistate licensing system.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the commissioner to require any person exempt from licensure under the provisions of law regulating consumer industry licensees to participate in the multistate licensing system.

The commissioner may establish, by rule, regulation or order, requirements as necessary, including, but not limited to:

Background checks for:

Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases;

Civil or administrative records;

Credit history; or

Any other information as deemed necessary by the multistate licensing system.

The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the multistate licensing system.

The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates; and

Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the commissioner deems necessary for participation in the multistate licensing system.

Any person engaged in activity that requires licensure pursuant to this section shall utilize the multistate licensing system for application, renewal, amendment, surrender and any other activity as the commissioner may require, and shall pay all applicable charges to utilize the multistate licensing system.

The commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contacts with the multistate licensing system or other entities designated by the multistate licensing system to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 81-1-137.
Financial literacy programs for the public.

The department may establish programs for the education of the public with respect to financial literacy, any provision of this title, or any industry regulated by the department. The department and the Office of Consumer Protection under its authority to establish programs for the education of the public under Section 75-24-21 may coordinate their efforts for the education programs authorized for the department under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 359, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.